Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3518
Acquisition of property; conditions.

A community improvement district may acquire by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, real or personal property, right-of-way, and privilege, within or without its corporate limits, necessary for its corporate purposes. Such acquisition by the community improvement district may be effected only after approval by the city or village having zoning jurisdiction over such property. The approval of plans and specifications for the public improvement or project, or the approval of plans and exact costs for public parks, playgrounds, and recreational facilities, as required by section 18-3522, shall be deemed to be approval for the acquisition by the community improvement district of such fee title, easements, or other interests in such property as may be required for the public improvement or project.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 18.
April 17, 2026